Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2216
Area agency on aging; designation by department.

The department shall designate, to perform the functions of an area agency on aging, any office or agency having the necessary authority and capacity which is proposed by the chief elected officials of a combination of units of local general-purpose governments formed under the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act.

Laws 1982, LB 404, § 16;

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 98.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.